Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5651.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 627a. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Regularly scheduled school session" means that part of a
day scheduled for student instruction until final dismissal of the
student body for that day.
(b) "School" means an educational institution operated by a
local school district or by a private, denominational, or parochial
organization. School does not include either of the following:
(i) An educational institution that the department of education
determines has its entire student population in residence at the
JJR H04462'25 (H-2) pub3xz


institution.
(ii) An educational institution to which all students are
transported in motor vehicles.
(c) "School zone" means school property on which a school
building is located and the adjacent property. A school zone
extends not more than 1,000 feet from the school property line in
any direction. If 2 or more schools occupy the same property or
adjacent properties, 1 of the following applies, as applicable:
(i) If the hours of instruction at the schools are the same,
then a single combined school zone shall must be established.
(ii) If the hours of instruction at the schools are different,
overlapping school zones shall must be established.
(2) A school zone speed limit on a highway segment in a school
zone, which, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, shall
must be in force not more than 30 60 minutes before the first
regularly scheduled school session, rounded to the nearest multiple
of 5 minutes, until school commences, and from dismissal until not
more than 30 60 minutes after the last regularly scheduled school
session, rounded to the nearest multiple of 5 minutes, may be
decreased by not more than 20 miles per hour less than the speed
limit normally posted but shall must be not less than 25 miles per
hour. A school superintendent may begin do any of the following:
(a) Begin the 30-minute 60-minute enforcement period before
the first regularly scheduled school session described in this
subsection at a time that is less than 30 60 minutes before the
first regularly scheduled school session and that extends beyond
the time school commences. , may begin
(b) Begin the 30-minute 60-minute enforcement period after
dismissal at a time other than dismissal. , and, if a school has an
JJR H04462'25 (H-2) pub3xz


off-campus lunch period, may designate the period provided for off-
campus lunch
(c) Subject to subsection (7), designate any of the following
as a an enforcement period during which the school zone speed limit
described in this subsection applies, but may not exceed 5 total
enforcement periods in 1 day:
(i) If a school has an off-campus lunch period, the off-campus
lunch period.
(ii) If a school has students go off-campus for a field trip or
for classes at another school, a career tech center, or a local
university, the period during which the students are leaving campus
or returning to campus.
(3) School zone speed limits shall do not apply to a limited
access highway or a highway segment over which a pedestrian
overhead walkway is erected, if the walkway is adjacent to school
property.
(4) Notwithstanding the requirements for a school zone as
defined in subsection (1)(c), if a school is located in an area
that requires school children to cross a state trunk line highway
or county highway that has a speed limit of 35 miles per hour or
more to attend that school, the school superintendent may submit a
request to the state transportation commission, county road
commission, or local authority having jurisdiction over the
roadway, as applicable, for a school crossing as permitted under
section 613a. If, based on the traffic engineering studies, the
road authority determines the need for a lower speed limit, the
road authority may designate the crossing as a school zone. Before
submitting a request, the school superintendent shall must have
completed a school route plan as prescribed by section 7A-1 of the
JJR H04462'25 (H-2) pub3xz


Michigan manual of uniform traffic control devices.
(5) If a school is in session year-round, a sign reading "All
Year School" shall must be posted on the same signpost as and
immediately below the school zone sign.
(6) Louvered signs, digital message signs, and flashing lights
may be installed to supplement or replace permanent signs required
under this section. Signs erected and maintained as required under
this section shall must conform to the Michigan manual on uniform
traffic control devices.
(7) If additional enforcement periods are designated under
subsection (2)(c), a school zone sign with flashing lights
indicating that the school zone speed limit is in effect must be
installed and be activated during that additional enforcement
period.
(8) (7) A person An individual who violates a speed limit
established under this section is responsible for a civil
infraction.
Final Page
JJR H04462'25 (H-2) pub3xz